Massachusetts, session 194th, H2525.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) The secretary of health and human services shall convene a working group to study
and make recommendations to establish and operate an acute care hospital in the town of
Norwood. The working group shall: (i) study the scope of care provided by Norwood Hospital as
previously operated by Steward Health Care prior to June 28 of 2020; (ii) solicit input from
stakeholders as well as experts in construction, hospital operation, and public health; (iii) issue
recommendations with the goal of creating an acute care hospital in the town of Norwood which
to provide comparable service to that in Norwood prior to June 28 of 2020.
(b) The secretary shall or their designee shall serve on the working group as its chair
and shall appoint the following members to the working group: the commissioner of the
Massachusetts department of public health or their designee; the representative of the 12th
Norfolk district in the Massachusetts house of representatives or their designee; the senator
representing the Norfolk and Suffolk district in the Massachusetts senate or their designee; the
representative of Massachusetts’s 8th congressional district in the United States house of
of 2

representatives or their designee; 1 member who shall represent the Massachusetts Nurses
Association; 1 member who shall represent Professional Firefighters of Massachusetts; the chief
of the fire department in the Town of Norwood or their designee; the chief of the police
department in the town of Norwood or their designee; and the chair of the Norwood select board.
(c) The working group shall first convene no later than 30 days after the final
passage of this act and shall issue a report of its findings and any recommendation with the
clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the joint committee on public health, and
the joint committee on ways and means not later than 120 days after its initial meeting.
of 2